Utah statutes.
49-23-503.   Death of active member in line of duty -- Payment of benefits.

If an active member of this system dies, benefits are payable as follows:

(1)  If the death is classified by the office as a line-of-duty death, benefits are payable as follows:

(a)  If the member has accrued less than 20 years of public safety service or firefighter service credit, the spouse at the time of death shall receive a lump sum of $1,000 and an allowance equal to 30% of the member's final average monthly salary.

(b)  If the member has accrued 20 or more years of public safety service or firefighter service credit, the member shall be considered to have retired with an Option One allowance calculated without an actuarial reduction under Section 49-23-304 and the spouse at the time of death shall receive the allowance that would have been payable to the member.

(2) (a)  A volunteer firefighter is eligible for a line-of-duty death benefit under this section if the death results from external force, violence, or disease directly resulting from firefighter service.

(b)  The lowest monthly compensation of firefighters of a city of the first class in this state at the time of death shall be considered to be the final average monthly salary of a volunteer firefighter for purposes of computing these benefits.

(c)  Each volunteer fire department shall maintain a current roll of all volunteer firefighters which meet the requirements of Subsection 49-23-102(12) to determine the eligibility for this benefit.

(3) (a)  If the death is classified as a line-of-duty death by the office, death benefits are payable under this section and the spouse at the time of death is not eligible for benefits under Section 49-23-502.

(b)  If the death is not classified as a line-of-duty death by the office, benefits are payable in accordance with Section 49-23-502.



Amended by Chapter 40, 2013 General Session

